src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibensimishinaanidigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishinaanidiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishinaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibensimishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibensimishiwaadigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishiwaadiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaadigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ozhiishiibenyimishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibenyimishiniidigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiniidiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiniidigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ozhiishiibensimishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibensimishiniidigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiniidiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiniidigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ozhiishiibensimishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibensimishiwaadigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiwaadiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaadigag
     
